New York, session 2025-2026, S10491.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (f) of section 1111 of the tax law, as added by 2 chapter 986 of the laws of 1983, is amended to read as follows: 3 (f) The retail sales tax imposed under subdivision (a) of section 4 eleven hundred five and the compensating use tax imposed under section 5 eleven hundred ten, when computed in respect to a new mobile home, shall 6 be computed on seventy percent of the receipts or consideration given 7 therefor by the purchaser or user; except if such new mobile home is 8 purchased as a primary residence it shall be computed on thirty-five 9 percent of the receipts or consideration given therefor by the purchaser 10 or user. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15687-01-6